California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 a position in a controlled game, as defined by the approved rules for that game, in which seated player participants are afforded the temporary opportunity to wager against multiple players at the same table, provided that this position is rotated amongst the other seated players in the game.

(ah) “Publicly traded racing association” means a corporation licensed to conduct horse racing and simulcast wagering pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19400) whose stock is publicly traded.

(ai) “Qualified racing association” means a corporation licensed to conduct horse racing and simulcast wagering pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19400) that is a wholly owned subsidiary of a corporation whose stock is publicly traded.

(aj) “Renewal license” means the license issued to the holder of an initial
 license that authorizes the license to continue beyond the expiration date of the initial license.

(ak) “Work permit” means any card, certificate, or permit issued by the commission, or by a county, city, or city and county, whether denominated as a work permit, registration card, or otherwise, authorizing the holder to be employed as a gambling enterprise employee or to serve as an independent agent. A document issued by any governmental authority for any employment other than gambling is not a valid work permit for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 79, Sec. 1.   (SB 884)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19806.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any way to permit or authorize any conduct made unlawful by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 319) of, or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330) of, Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, or any local ordinance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 867, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19807.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, whenever the department or commission is a defendant or respondent in any proceeding, or when there is any legal challenge to regulations issued by the commission or department, venue for the proceeding shall be in the County of Sacramento, the City and County of San Francisco, the County of Los Angeles, or the County of San Diego.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 4.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [19810. - 19830.]

19810.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any power or authority of the department described in this chapter may be exercised by the Attorney General or any other person as the Attorney General may delegate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 5.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19811.

(a) There is in state government the California Gambling Control Commission, consisting of five members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. The California Gambling Control Commission shall succeed to all of the powers of the former California Gambling Control Board.

(b) Jurisdiction, including jurisdiction over operation and concentration, and supervision over gambling establishments in this state and over all persons or things having to do with the operations of gambling establishments is vested in the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19810A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19812.

(a) Each member of the commission shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of this state.

(b) No Member of the Legislature, no person holding any elective office in state, county, or local government, and no officer or official of any political party is eligible for appointment to the commission.

(c) No more than three of the five members of the commission shall be members of the same political party.

(d) A person is ineligible for appointment to the commission if, within two years prior to appointment, the person, or any partnership or corporation in which the person is a principal, was employed by, retained by, or derived substantial income from, any gambling establishment. For the purposes of this subdivision, “gambling establishment” means one or more rooms wherein any gaming within the meaning of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, or any controlled game within the meaning of Section 337j of the Penal Code, is conducted, whether or not the activity occurred in California.

(e) One member of the commission shall be a certified public accountant or a person with experience in banking or finance, one member shall be an attorney and a member of the State Bar of California with regulatory law experience, one member shall have a background in law enforcement and criminal investigation, one member shall have a background in business with at least five years of business experience or alternatively five years of governmental experience, and one member shall be from the public at large.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 854, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19813.

(a) Of the members initially appointed, two shall be appointed for a term of two years, two shall be appointed for a term of three years, and one shall be appointed for a term of four years. After the initial terms, the term of office of each member of the commission is four years.

(b) The Governor shall appoint the members of the commission, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall designate one member to serve as chairperson. The initial appointments shall be made within three months of the operative date of this section. Thereafter, vacancies shall be filled within 60 days of the date of the vacancy by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(c) The Governor may remove any member of the commission for incompetence, neglect of duty, or corruption upon first giving him or her a copy of the charges and an opportunity to be heard.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19812A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19814.

(a) During their terms of office, the members of the commission shall not engage in any other business, vocation, or employment.

(b) Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, the chief and each member of the commission shall subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and, in addition, swear that he or she is not, and during his or her term of office shall not be, pecuniarily interested in, or doing business with, any person, business, or organization holding a gambling license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 6.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19815.

(a) The members of the commission shall receive the salary provided for by Section 11553.5 of the Government Code.

(b) The chairperson of the commission shall receive the salary provided for by Section 11553 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19814A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19816.

(a) The commission shall have an executive director appointed by the commission. A person is ineligible for appointment as executive director or deputy executive director if, within two years prior to appointment, the person, or any partnership or corporation in which the person is a principal, was employed by, retained by, or derived substantial income from, any gambling establishment, whether or not a controlled gambling establishment.

(b) The executive director shall receive the annual salary established by the commission and approved by the Department of Human Resources. The executive director shall be the commission’s executive officer and shall carry out and execute the duties as specified by law and by the
 commission.

(c) The commission may appoint other staff and clerical personnel as necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 5.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19817.

The commission shall establish and appoint a Gaming Policy Advisory Committee of 10 members. The committee shall be composed of representatives of controlled gambling licensees and members of the general public in equal numbers. The executive director shall, from time to time, convene the committee for the purpose of discussing matters of controlled gambling regulatory policy and any other relevant gambling-related issue. The recommendations concerning gambling policy made by the committee shall be presented to the commission, but shall be deemed advisory and not binding on the commission in the performance of its duties or functions. The committee may not advise the commission on Indian gaming.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19815.5A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19818.

(a) The commission shall investigate the following matters:

(1) The consequences, benefits, and disadvantages of imposing a state tax on revenue generated by licensed gambling establishments.

(2) Regulation of advertising for the purpose of limiting exposure of children to materials promoting gambling.

(b) The commission shall report its findings to the Legislature and the Governor no later than January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19815.8A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19819.

(a) The commission shall establish and maintain a general office for the transaction of its business in Sacramento. The commission may hold meetings at any place within the state when the interests of the public may be better served.

(b) A public record of every vote shall be maintained at the commission’s principal office.

(c) A majority of the membership of the commission is a quorum of the commission. The concurring vote of three members of the commission shall be required for any official action of the commission or for the exercise of any of the commission’s duties, powers, or
 functions.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code applies to meetings of the commission. Notwithstanding Section 11125.1 of the Government Code, documents, which are filed with the commission by the department for the purpose of evaluating the qualifications of an applicant, are exempt from disclosure under Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 34.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

19820.

The commission may employ not more than eight attorneys. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to exempt the commission from the operation of Section 11040, 11042, or 11043 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19818A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19821.

(a) The commission shall cause to be made and kept a record of all proceedings at regular and special meetings of the commission. These records shall be open to public inspection.

(b) The department shall maintain a file of all applications for licenses under this chapter. The commission shall maintain a record of all actions taken with respect to those applications. The file and record shall be open to public inspection.

(c) The department and commission may maintain any other files and records as they deem appropriate. Except as provided in this chapter, the records of the department and commission are exempt from
 disclosure under Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(d) Except as necessary for the administration of this chapter, no commissioner and no official, employee, or agent of the commission or the department, having obtained access to confidential records or information in the performance of duties pursuant to this chapter, shall knowingly disclose or furnish the records or information, or any part thereof, to any person who is not authorized by law to receive it. A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (k) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code, a court shall not compel disclosure of personal information in the possession of the department or the commission to any person in any civil proceeding
 wherein the department or the commission is not a party, except for good cause and upon a showing that the information cannot otherwise be obtained. This section shall not authorize the disclosure of personal information that is otherwise exempt from disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 35.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

19822.

(a) All files, records, reports, and other information in possession of any state or local governmental agency that are relevant to an investigation by the department conducted pursuant to this chapter shall be made available to the department as requested. However, any tax information received from a governmental agency shall be used solely for effectuating the purposes of this chapter. To the extent that the files, records, reports, or information described in this section are confidential or otherwise privileged from disclosure under any law or exercise of discretion, they shall not lose that confidential or privileged status for having been disclosed to the department.

(b) All files, records, reports, and other information pertaining to gambling matters in the possession of the department shall be open at all times to inspection by the members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 9.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19823.

(a) The responsibilities of the commission include, without limitation, all of the following:

(1) Assuring that licenses, approvals, and permits are not issued to, or held by, unqualified or disqualified persons, or by persons whose operations are conducted in a manner that is inimical to the public health, safety, or welfare.

(2) Assuring that there is no material involvement, directly or indirectly, with a licensed gambling operation, or the ownership or management thereof, by unqualified or disqualified persons, or by persons whose operations are conducted in a manner that is inimical to the public health, safety, or welfare.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “unqualified person” means a person who is found to be unqualified pursuant to the criteria set forth in Section 19857, and “disqualified person” means a person who is found to be disqualified pursuant to the criteria set forth in Section 19859.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19822A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19824.

The commission shall have all powers necessary and proper to enable it fully and effectually to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, including, without limitation, the power to do all of the following:

(a) Require any person to apply for a license, permit, registration, or approval as specified in this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) For any cause deemed reasonable by the commission, deny any application for a license, permit, or approval provided for in this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, limit, condition, or restrict any license, permit, or approval, or impose any fine upon any person licensed or approved. The
 commission may condition, restrict, discipline, or take action against the license of an individual owner endorsed on the license certificate of the gambling enterprise whether or not the commission takes action against the license of the gambling enterprise.

(c) Approve or disapprove transactions, events, and processes as provided in this chapter.

(d) Take actions deemed to be reasonable to ensure that no ineligible, unqualified, disqualified, or unsuitable persons are associated with controlled gambling activities.

(e) Take actions deemed to be reasonable to ensure that gambling activities take place only in suitable locations.

(f) Grant temporary licenses, permits, or approvals on appropriate terms and conditions.

(g) Institute a civil action in any superior court against any person subject to this chapter to restrain a violation of this chapter. An action brought against a person pursuant to this section does not preclude a criminal action or administrative proceeding against that person by the Attorney General or any district attorney or city attorney.

(h) Issue subpoenas to compel attendance of witnesses and production of documents and other material things at a meeting or hearing of the commission or its committees, including advisory committees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 233, Sec. 3.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19824.5.

The executive director and members of the commission may administer oaths and certify official acts in connection with the business of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.   (SB 829)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19825.

The commission may require that any matter of an adjudicative nature regarding a license, permit, or finding of suitability, that the commission is authorized or required to consider in an evidentiary hearing, including a hearing held pursuant to Section 19870, be heard and determined in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 45, Sec. 1.   (AB 120)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19826.

The department shall perform all investigatory functions required by this chapter, as well as auditing functions under tribal gaming compacts, and shall have all of the following responsibilities:

(a) To receive and process applications for any license, permit, or other approval, and to collect all related fees. The department shall investigate the qualifications of applicants before any license, permit, or other approval is issued, and investigate any request to the commission for any approval that may be required pursuant to this chapter. The department may recommend the denial or the limitation, conditioning, or restriction of any license, permit, or other approval.

(b) To monitor the conduct of all licensees and other persons having a material involvement, directly or indirectly, with a gambling operation or its holding company, for the purpose of ensuring that licenses are not issued or held by, and that there is no direct or indirect material involvement with, a gambling operation or holding company by ineligible, unqualified, disqualified, or unsuitable persons, or persons whose operations are conducted in a manner that is inimical to the public health, safety, or welfare.

(c) (1) To investigate suspected violations of this chapter or laws of this state relating to gambling, including any activity prohibited by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 319) or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330) of Title 9 of Part 1 of
 the Penal Code.

(2) This subdivision includes the responsibility to investigate suspected violations of illegal gambling activities conducted outside of licensed gambling establishments, irrespective of whether the suspected violation involves licensees.

(d) To investigate complaints that are lodged against licensees, or other persons associated with a gambling operation, by members of the public.

(e) To initiate, where appropriate, disciplinary actions as provided in this chapter. In connection with any disciplinary action, the department may seek restriction, limitation, suspension, or revocation of any license or approval, or the imposition of any fine upon any person licensed or approved.

(f) To adopt regulations reasonably related to its functions and duties as specified in this chapter.

(g) Approve the play of any controlled game, including placing restrictions and limitations on how a controlled game may be played. The department shall make available to the public the rules of play and the collection rates of each gaming activity approved for play at each gambling establishment on the Attorney General’s internet website. Actual costs incurred by the department to review and approve game rules shall be reimbursed to the department by the licensee making the request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.   (SB 451)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19827.

(a) The department has all powers necessary and proper to enable it to carry out fully and effectually the duties and responsibilities of the department specified in this chapter. The investigatory powers of the department include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Upon approval of the chief, and without notice or warrant, the department may take any of the following actions:

(A) Visit, investigate, and place expert accountants, technicians, and any other person, as it may deem necessary, in all areas of the premises wherein controlled gambling is conducted for the purpose of determining compliance with the
 rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(B) Visit, inspect, and examine all premises where gambling equipment is manufactured, sold, or distributed.

(C) Inspect all equipment and supplies in any gambling establishment or in any premises where gambling equipment is manufactured, sold, or distributed.

(D) Summarily seize, remove, and impound any equipment, supplies, documents, or records from any licensed premises for the purpose of examination and inspection. However, upon reasonable demand by the licensee or the licensee’s authorized representative, a copy of all documents and records seized shall be made and left on the premises.

(E) Demand access to, and inspect, examine, photocopy, and audit all papers, books, and records of an owner licensee on the gambling premises in the presence of the licensee or the licensee’s agent.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), upon obtaining an inspection warrant pursuant to Section 1822.60 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the department may inspect and seize for inspection, examination, or photocopying any property possessed, controlled, bailed, or otherwise held by any applicant, licensee, or any intermediary company, or holding company.

(3) (A) The department may investigate, for purposes of
 prosecution, any suspected criminal violation of this chapter.

(B) The department may investigate, for purposes of prosecution, any suspected criminal violation of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 319) or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, including a suspected criminal violation that occurs outside of a licensed gambling establishment, irrespective of whether the suspected violation involves licensees.

(C) This paragraph does not limit the powers conferred by any other law on agents of the department who are peace officers. 

(4) The department may do both of the following:

(A) Issue subpoenas to
 require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books, records, documents, and physical materials.

(B) Administer oaths, examine witnesses under oath, take evidence, and take depositions and affidavits or declarations. Notwithstanding Section 11189 of the Government Code, the department, without leave of court, may take the deposition of any applicant or any licensee. Sections 11185 and 11191 of the Government Code do not apply to a witness who is an applicant or a licensee.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to limit warrantless inspections except as required by the California Constitution or the United States Constitution.

(2) Subdivision (a) shall not be
 construed to prevent entries and administrative inspections, including seizures of property, without a warrant in the following circumstances:

(A) With the consent of the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the premises.

(B) In situations presenting imminent danger to health and safety.

(C) In situations involving inspection of conveyances where there is reasonable cause to believe that the mobility of the conveyance makes it impractical to obtain a warrant, or in any other exceptional or emergency circumstance where time or opportunity to apply for a warrant is lacking.

(D) In accordance with this chapter.

(E) In all other situations where a warrant is not constitutionally required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 584, Sec. 2.   (SB 451)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19828.

(a) Without limiting any privilege that is otherwise available under law, any communication or publication from, or concerning, an applicant, licensee, or registrant, in oral, written, or any other form, is absolutely privileged and so shall not form a basis for imposing liability for defamation or constitute a ground for recovery in any civil action, under any of the following circumstances:

(1) It was made or published by an agent or employee of the department or commission in the proper discharge of official duties or in the course of any proceeding under this chapter.

(2) It was required to be made or published to the department or commission, or any of their agents or employees, by law, regulation, or subpoena of the department or the commission.

(3) It was, in good faith, made or published to the department or the commission for the purpose of causing, assisting, or aiding an investigation conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) If any document or communication provided to the department or the commission contains any information that is privileged pursuant to Division 8 (commencing with Section 900) of the Evidence Code, or any other provision of law, that privilege is not waived or lost because the document or communication is disclosed to the department or the commission or to any of their agents or employees.

(c) The department, the commission, and their agents and employees shall not release or disclose any information, documents, or communications provided by an applicant, licensee, or other person, that are privileged pursuant to Division 8 (commencing with Section 900) of the Evidence Code, or any other provision of law, without the prior written consent of the holder of the privilege, or pursuant to lawful court order after timely notice of the proceedings has been given to the holder of the privilege. An application to a court for an order requiring the department or the commission to release any information declared by law to be confidential shall be made only upon motion made in writing on not less than 10-business days’ notice to the department or the commission, and to all persons who may be affected by the entry of the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 12.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19829.

Every district attorney, and every state and local law enforcement agency, shall furnish to the department, on forms prepared by the department, all information obtained during the course of any substantial investigation or prosecution of any person, as determined by the department, if it appears that a violation of any law related to gambling has occurred, including any violation of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 319) or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 13.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19830.

There is an investigative account within the Gambling Control Fund. All funds received for the purpose of paying expenses incurred by the department for investigation of an application for a license or approval under this chapter shall be deposited in the account. Expenses may be advanced from the investigative account to the department by the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 14.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulations [19840. - 19846.]

19840.

The commission may adopt regulations for the administration and enforcement of this chapter. To the extent appropriate, regulations of the commission and the department shall take into consideration the operational differences of large and small establishments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 15.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19841.

The regulations adopted by the commission shall do all of the following:

(a) With respect to applications, registrations, investigations, and fees, the regulations shall include, but not be limited to, provisions that do all of the following:

(1) Prescribe the method and manner of application and registration.

(2) Prescribe the information to be furnished by any applicant, licensee, or registrant concerning, as appropriate, the person’s personal history, habits, character, associates, criminal record, business activities, organizational structure, and financial affairs, past or present.

(3) Prescribe the information to be furnished by an owner licensee relating to the licensee’s gambling employees.

(4) Require fingerprinting or other methods of identification of an applicant, licensee, or employee of a licensee.

(5) Prescribe the manner and method of collection and payment of fees and issuance of licenses.

(b) Provide for the approval of game rules and equipment by the department to ensure fairness to the public and compliance with state laws.

(c) Implement the provisions of this chapter relating to licensing and other approvals.

(d) Require owner licensees to report and keep records of transactions, including
 transactions as determined by the department, involving cash or credit. The regulations may include, without limitation, regulations requiring owner licensees to file with the department reports similar to those required by Sections 5313 and 5314 of Title 31 of the United States Code, and by Sections 103.22 and 103.23 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any successor provisions thereto, from financial institutions, as defined in Section 5312 of Title 31 of the United States Code and Section 103.11 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any successor provisions.

(e) Provide for the receipt of protests and written comments on an application by public agencies, public officials, local governing bodies, or residents of the location of the gambling establishment or future gambling establishment.

(f) Provide for the disapproval of advertising by licensed
 gambling establishments that is determined by the department to be deceptive to the public. Regulations adopted by the commission for advertising by licensed gambling establishments shall be consistent with the advertising regulations adopted by the California Horse Racing Board and the Lottery Commission. Advertisement that appeals to children or adolescents or that offers gambling as a means of becoming wealthy is presumptively deceptive.

(g) Govern all of the following:

(1) The extension of credit.

(2) The cashing, deposit, and redemption of checks or other negotiable instruments.

(3) The verification of identification in monetary transactions.

(h) Prescribe minimum procedures for
 adoption by owner licensees to exercise effective control over their internal fiscal and gambling affairs, which shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for all of the following:

(1) The safeguarding of assets and revenues, including the recording of cash and evidences of indebtedness.

(2) Prescribing the manner in which compensation from games and gross revenue shall be computed and reported by an owner licensee.

(3) The provision of reliable records, accounts, and reports of transactions, operations, and events, including reports to the department.

(i) Provide for the adoption and use of internal audits, whether by qualified internal auditors or by certified public accountants. As used in this subdivision, “internal audit” means a type of
 control that operates through the testing and evaluation of other controls and that is also directed toward observing proper compliance with the minimum standards of control prescribed in subdivision (h).

(j) Require periodic financial reports from each owner licensee.

(k) Specify standard forms for reporting financial conditions, results of operations, and other relevant financial information.

(l) Formulate a uniform code of accounts and accounting classifications to ensure consistency, comparability, and effective disclosure of financial information.

(m) Prescribe intervals at which the information in subdivisions (j) and (k) shall be furnished to the department.

(n) Require audits to be
 conducted, in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, of the financial statements of all owner licensees whose annual gross revenues equal or exceed a specified sum. However, nothing herein shall be construed to limit the department’s authority to require audits of any owner licensee. Audits, compilations, and reviews provided for in this subdivision shall be made by independent certified public accountants licensed to practice in this state.

(o) Restrict, limit, or otherwise regulate any activity that is related to the conduct of controlled gambling, consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(p) Define and limit the area, games, hours of operation, number of tables, wagering limits, and equipment permitted, or the method of operation of games and equipment, if the commission, upon the recommendation of, or in consultation with, the department, determines that
 local regulation of these subjects is insufficient to protect the health, safety, or welfare of residents in geographical areas proximate to a gambling establishment.

(q) Prohibit gambling enterprises from cashing checks drawn against any federal, state, or county fund, including, but not limited to, social security, unemployment insurance, disability payments, or public assistance payments. However, a gambling enterprise shall not be prohibited from cashing any payroll checks or checks for the delivery of goods or services that are drawn against a federal, state, or county fund.

(r) Provide for standards, specifications, and procedures governing the manufacture, distribution, including the sale and leasing, inspection, testing, location, operation, repair, and storage of gambling equipment, and for the licensing of persons engaged in the business of manufacturing, distributing,
 including the sale and leasing, inspection, testing, repair, and storage of gambling equipment.

(s) By December 31, 2011, provide procedures, criteria, and timelines for the processing and approval of applications for the licensing, temporary or interim licensing, or findings of suitability for receivers, trustees, beneficiaries, executors, administrators, conservators, successors in interest, or security interest holders for a gambling enterprise so that gambling enterprises may operate continuously in cases including, but not limited to, the death, insolvency, foreclosure, receivership, or incapacity of a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 3.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

19842.

(a) The commission shall not prohibit, on a statewide basis, the play of any game or restrict the manner in which any game is played, unless the commission, in a proceeding pursuant to this article, finds that the game, or the manner in which the game is played, violates a law of the United States, a law of this state, or a local ordinance.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the powers of the commission in a proceeding against a licensee pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 19930).

(c) No regulation prohibiting a game or the manner in which a game is played shall be deemed to be an emergency regulation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19834.5A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19843.

The commission shall not prohibit, on a statewide basis, the placing of a wager on a controlled game by a person at a gaming table, if the person is present at the table and actively participating in the hand with a single-seated player upon whose hand the wagers are placed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19834.6A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19844.

(a) The commission shall, by regulation, provide for the formulation of a list of persons who are to be excluded or ejected from any gambling establishment. The list may include any person whose presence in the establishment is determined by the commission to pose a threat to the interests of this state or to controlled gambling, or both.

(b) In making the determination described in subdivision (a), the commission may consider, but is not limited to considering, any of the following:

(1) Prior conviction of a crime that is a felony in this state or under the laws of the United States, a crime involving moral turpitude, or a violation of the gambling laws of this or any other state.

(2) The violation of, or conspiracy to violate, the provisions of this chapter relating to the failure to disclose an interest in a gambling establishment for which the person is required to obtain a license, or the willful evasion of fees.

(3) A notorious or unsavory reputation that would adversely affect public confidence and trust that the gambling industry is free from criminal or corruptive elements.

(4) An order of exclusion or ejection from a racing enclosure issued by the California Horse Racing Board.

(c) The commission shall distribute the list of persons who are to be excluded or ejected from any gambling establishment to all owner licensees and shall provide notice to any persons included on the list.

(d) The commission shall adopt regulations establishing procedures for hearing of petitions by persons who are ejected or excluded from licensed premises pursuant to this section or pursuant to Section 19845.

(e) The commission may revoke, limit, condition, or suspend the license of an owner, or fine an owner licensee, if that licensee knowingly fails to exclude or eject from the gambling establishment of that licensee any person included on the list of persons to be excluded or ejected.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19835A by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19845.

(a) A licensee may remove from his or her licensed premises any person who, while on the premises:

(1) Is a disorderly person, as defined by Section 647 of the Penal Code.

(2) Interferes with a lawful gambling operation.

(3) Solicits or engages in any act of prostitution.

(4) Begs, is boisterous, or is otherwise offensive to other persons.
